Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202558-221
Residential energy conservation device, defined.

Residential energy conservation device shall mean any prudent means of reducing the demands for conventional fuels or increasing the supply or efficiency of these fuels in residential housing and shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Caulking and weather stripping of doors and windows;

(2) Furnace efficiency modifications, including:

(a) Replacement burners, furnaces, heat pumps, or boilers or any combination thereof which, as determined by the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment, substantially increases the energy efficiency of the heating system;

(b) Any device for modifying flue openings which will increase the energy efficiency of the heating system; and

(c) Any electrical or mechanical furnace ignition system which replaces a standing gas pilot light;

(3) A clock thermostat;

(4) Ceiling, attic, wall, and floor insulation;

(5) Water heater insulation;

(6) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, and heat-absorbed or heat-reflective glazed window and door materials;

(7) Any device which controls demand of appliances and aids load management;

(8) Any device to utilize solar energy, biomass, geothermal, or wind power for any residential energy conservation purpose including heating of water and space heating or cooling; and

(9) Any other conservation device, renewable energy technology, and specific home improvement necessary to insure the effectiveness of the energy conservation measures as the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment by rule or regulation identifies.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 21;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 64;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 322.